Washington statutes.
RCW 11.20.080

Restraint of personal representative during pendency of application to prove lost or destroyed will.

If, before or during the pendency of an application to prove a lost or destroyed will, letters of administration shall have been granted on the estate of the testator, or letters testamentary of any previous will of the testator shall have been granted, the court shall have authority to restrain the personal representatives so appointed, from any acts or proceedings which would be injurious to the legatees or devisees claiming under the lost or destroyed will.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.20.080. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 21; RRS s 1391; prior: Code 1881 s 1369; 1863 p 215 s 105; 1860 p 177 s 72.]

NOTES:

Replacement of lost or destroyed probate records: RCW 5.48.060.